Nevada, session 83, SB62.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Sections 1-4. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 4.3. NRS 217.070 is hereby amended to read as follows:
217.070 1. “Victim” means a person who suffers direct or
threatened physical, financial or psychological harm as a result of
the commission of a crime, including, without limitation:
(a) A person who is injured or killed as the direct result of a
criminal act;
(b) A minor who was involved in the production of pornography
in violation of NRS 200.710, 200.720, 200.725 or 200.730;
(c) A minor who was sexually abused, as “sexual abuse” is
defined in NRS 432B.100;
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 2 –
(d) A person who is physically injured or killed as the direct
result of a violation of NRS 484C.110 or any act or neglect of duty
punishable pursuant to NRS 484C.430 or 484C.440;
(e) A pedestrian who is physically injured or killed as the direct
result of a driver of a motor vehicle who failed to stop at the scene
of a crash involving the driver and the pedestrian in violation of
NRS 484E.010;
(f) An older person or a vulnerable person who is abused,
neglected, exploited, isolated or abandoned in violation of NRS
200.5099 or 200.50995;
(g) A person who is physically injured or killed as the direct
result of an act of international terrorism as defined in 18 U.S.C. §
2331(1);
(h) A person who is trafficked in violation of subsection 2 of
NRS 201.300;
(i) A veteran who experienced an act of sexual assault while
serving on active duty, active duty for training or inactive duty
training;
(j) A person who is subjected to facilitating sex trafficking in
violation of subsection 1 of NRS 201.301; [or]
(k) A person who is the victim of a crime for which an
additional penalty is imposed pursuant to NRS 193.1675 or an
enhanced penalty is imposed pursuant to NRS 207.185; or
(l) A person who is an immediate family member of a victim
who:
(1) Is a minor;
(2) Is physically or mentally incompetent; or
(3) Was killed.
2. The term includes any person who was harmed by an act
listed in subsection 1, regardless of whether:
(a) The person is a resident of this State, a citizen of the United
States or is lawfully entitled to reside in the United States; or
(b) The act was committed by an adult or a minor.
Sec. 4.7. NRS 217.160 is hereby amended to read as follows:
217.160 1. The compensation officer may order the payment
of compensation:
(a) To or for the benefit of the victim.
(b) If the victim has suffered personal injury, to any person
responsible for the maintenance of the victim who has suffered
pecuniary loss or incurred expenses as a result of the injury.
(c) If the victim dies, to or for the benefit of any one or more of
the dependents of the victim.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 3 –
(d) To a minor who is a member of the household or immediate
family of a victim of a battery which constitutes domestic violence
pursuant to NRS 33.018 who needs an assessment, a psychological
evaluation or psychological counseling for emotional trauma
suffered by the minor as a result of the battery.
(e) To a member of the victim’s household or immediate family
for psychological counseling for emotional trauma suffered by the
member as a result of the crime of murder as defined in
NRS 200.010.
(f) To a county in whose jurisdiction a sexual assault was
committed for the reimbursement of costs associated with a forensic
medical examination of a victim of sexual assault that are paid by
the county pursuant to NRS 217.300. A county may be reimbursed
pursuant to this paragraph in an amount equal to the cost of 10
forensic medical examinations or $10,000, whichever is less, each
fiscal year.
(g) To a victim described in paragraph (k) of subsection 1 of
NRS 217.070 for the remediation of property owned by the victim
that was damaged in the commission of the crime, in an amount
not to exceed $1,000 for each incident.
2. As used in this section:
(a) “Battery” has the meaning ascribed to it in paragraph (a) of
subsection 1 of NRS 200.481.
(b) “Forensic medical examination” has the meaning ascribed to
it in NRS 217.300.
(c) “Household” means an association of persons who live in the
same home or dwelling and who:
(1) Have significant personal ties to the victim; or
(2) Are related by blood, adoption or marriage, within the
first degree of consanguinity or affinity.
(d) “Immediate family” means persons who are related by
blood, adoption or marriage, within the first degree of consanguinity
or affinity.
(e) “Victim of sexual assault” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 217.280.
Sec. 5. 1. There is hereby appropriated from the State
General Fund to the Fund for the Compensation of Victims of
Crime created by NRS 217.260 for the purposes described in
subsection 2 the following sums:
For the Fiscal Year 2025-2026 .................................... $30,000
For the Fiscal Year 2026-2027 .................................... $30,000
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 4 –
2. The money appropriated by subsection 1 must be used to
provide monetary aid to victims of hate crimes as described in
chapter 217 of NRS.
3. There is hereby appropriated from the State General Fund to
the Office of the Attorney General for the purposes described in
subsection 4 the following sums:
For the Fiscal Year 2025-2026 .................................... $20,000
For the Fiscal Year 2026-2027 .................................... $20,000
4. The money appropriated by subsection 3 must be used to
provide support and resources to survivors of crimes prosecuted by
the Office of the Attorney General.
5. There is hereby appropriated from the State General Fund to
the Account for Victims of Human Trafficking created by NRS
217.530 the sum of $200,000.
6. As used in this section, “hate crime” means a crime for
which an:
(a) Additional penalty is imposed pursuant to NRS 193.1675; or
(b) Enhanced penalty is imposed pursuant to NRS 207.185.
Sec. 6. (Deleted by amendment.)
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)